Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3133.03
Division of Medicaid and Long-Term
Care; strategic plan; key goals; benchmarks; progress reports.

(1) For the biennium
ending June 30, 2017, and the biennium ending June 30, 2019, the Division
of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services
shall, as part of the appropriations request process pursuant to section 81-132,
include a strategic plan that identifies the main purpose or purposes of each
program, verifiable and auditable key goals that the division believes are
fair measures of its progress in meeting each program's main purpose or purposes,
and benchmarks for improving performance on the key goals. The division shall
also report whether the benchmarks are being met and, if not, the expected
timeframes for meeting them. Such key goals and benchmarks shall be developed
by the division with the assistance of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 81-1113.

(2) Not later
than September 15, 2015, and not later than September 15, 2017, the Division
of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services
shall report electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on the
progress towards the key goals identified pursuant to this section that occurred
in the previous twelve months. The division shall annually appear at a joint
hearing of the two legislative committees and present the report.

Laws 2014, LB974, § 14.
April 3, 2014